Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB229.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Keystone Solvency Operating Study Commission Act.Section 2. Legislative intent.The intent of this act is to provide insight into financial risks relative to unfunded pension liabilities, other postemployment benefit unfunded liabilities, deferred public sector infrastructure projects to include deferred maintenance, municipal solvency concerns, school district solvency concerns, debt service solvency risks of the Commonwealth, financial stress testing of the Commonwealth's cash flow projections and current comprehensive annual financial reports under various economic scenarios and other financial risks that may come before the Keystone Solvency Operating Study Commission and 123456789101112131415161718 provide financial analysis of other states considered financially vulnerable.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commission." The Keystone Solvency Operating Study Commission established under section 4."Commonwealth." The Commonwealth of Pennsylvania."Critical risk factor." Any element of risk of sufficient magnitude which, if not dealt with, may negatively affect the ability of the Commonwealth to continue to meet financial obligations."PROMESA." Puerto Rico Oversight, Management, and Economic Stability Act (Public Law 114-187, 20 U.S.C. § 2101 et seq.).Section 4. Keystone Solvency Operating Study Commission.(a) Establishment.--The Keystone Solvency Operating Study Commission is established as a legislative commission for the purpose of analyzing the economic conditions of the Commonwealth, specifically unfunded obligations of school districts, municipalities and public pension plans. The commission shall consider unfunded postemployment benefits of the Commonwealth to determine the impact on operations of other financial commitments during periods of economic recession. The study shall ensure that the priority of financial claims is understood within the framework of the Constitution of Pennsylvania. The commission shall be comprised of the following members:(1) One member appointed by the Governor.(2) One member appointed by the President pro tempore of 20250HB0229PN0182 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Senate.(3) One member appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.(4) One member appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate.(5) One member appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(b) Duties.--The commission shall:(1) Analyze the financial insolvencies under PROMESA and solvency concerns of other states to determine if the Commonwealth can become bankrupt or insolvent and to determine lessons learned on the impact that insolvency proceedings may have on the Commonwealth's ability to meet its financial obligations in annual operating budgets.(2) Assess how insolvency proceedings may affect the Commonwealth's ability to meet its obligations to make employer contributions to the Public School Employees' Retirement System under 24 Pa.C.S. § 8326 (relating to contributions by the Commonwealth) and to the State Employees' Retirement System under 71 Pa.C.S. § 5507 (relating to contributions to the system by the Commonwealth and other employers), including employer contributions necessary to pay each system's respective unfunded actuarial accrued liability.(3) Assess how insolvency proceedings may affect the ability of the State Employees' Retirement System and the Public School Employees' Retirement System to pay benefits to annuitants and beneficiaries.(4) In consultation with the Independent Fiscal Office, develop cash flow projections for the immediate five years 20250HB0229PN0182 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 following the effective date of this section. The projections shall include best case, expected case and worst-case scenarios to be defined by the Independent Fiscal Office in the creation of the projections.(5) Determine critical risk factors of importance to the Commonwealth for financial well-being and other control measures to monitor the associated risk factors.(6) Develop performance metrics for use by the Independent Fiscal Office to monitor the critical risk factors identified with the measures published in the quarterly economic updates from the Independent Fiscal Office.(c) Quorum.--A majority of appointed members shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of conducting business.(d) Chairperson and vice chairperson.--The members shall select one of the members to be chairperson and another member to be vice chairperson.(e) Qualified vote.--A vote on the findings and recommendations to the General Assembly under section 5 shall require two-thirds of the members voting in the affirmative.(f) Compensation and reimbursement.--Members of the commission shall not receive compensation or reimbursement for their services on the commission.(g) Information gathering.--The commission may conduct hearings and otherwise gather pertinent information and analysis that the commission considers appropriate and necessary to fulfill its duties.(h) Support.--The General Assembly shall provide administrative support, meeting space and any other assistance required by the commission to carry out the commission's duties 20250HB0229PN0182 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under this act.(i) Transparency and ethics.--The commission shall be subject to the following laws:(1) 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings).(2) The act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law. The commission shall be considered a legislative agency as defined in section 102 of the Right-to-Know Law.Section 5. Report and expiration.(a) Report.--The commission shall report its findings and recommendations to the Governor and the General Assembly within 12 months of its first organizational meeting. The report shall be directly submitted to:(1) The President pro tempore of the Senate.(2) The Speaker of the House of Representatives.(3) The Majority Leader of the Senate.(4) The Majority Leader of the House of Representatives.(5) The Minority Leader of the Senate.(6) The Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(7) The chair and minority chair of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(8) The chair and minority chair of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(9) The chair and minority chair of the Finance Committee of the Senate.(10) The chair and minority chair of the Finance Committee of the House of Representatives.(11) The chair and minority chair of the State Government Committee of the Senate.(12) The chair and minority chair of the State 20250HB0229PN0182 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Government Committee of the House of Representatives.(b) Expiration.--The commission shall expire 60 days after delivery of its report under subsection (a).Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 30 days.20250HB0229PN0182 - 6 - 12345